Nebraska, session 109, LB786.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-3,122.03, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is amended to read:
60-3,122.03 (1) The department shall design license plates to be
known as Military Honor Plates.
(2)(a) The department shall create a design for each of the
following armed forces that honors designs honoring persons who have
served or are serving in the:
(i) United States Army; ,
(ii) United States Army Reserve; ,
(iii) United States Navy; ,
(iv) United States Navy Reserve; ,
(v) United States Marine Corps; ,
(vi) United States Marine Corps Reserve; ,
(vii) United States Coast Guard; ,
(viii) United States Coast Guard Reserve; ,
(ix) United States Air Force; ,
(x) United States Air Force Reserve; or ,
(xi) United States Space Force. ,
(b) The department shall create a design for each of the following
armed forces that honors persons who have served or are serving in the:
(i) Air National Guard; , or
(ii) Army National Guard.
(b) The department may begin issuing the license plates with the
design honoring persons who have served or are serving in the United
States Space Force on January 1, 2026.
(3) The design for each of the armed forces specified in subsection
(2) of this section shall reflect the There shall be thirteen such
designs, one for each of such armed forces reflecting its official
emblem, official seal, or other official image of such armed forces. The
issuance of plates for each of such armed forces shall be conditioned on
the approval of the armed forces owning the copyright to the official
-2-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
emblem, official seal, or other official image.
(4) (4)(a) The department shall create six additional designs
honoring persons who are serving or have served in the armed forces of
the United States and who have been awarded the Afghanistan Campaign
Medal, Iraq Campaign Medal, Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal,
Southwest Asia Service Medal, Vietnam Service Medal, or Inherent Resolve
Campaign Medal.
(b) A person may apply for license plates with the Inherent Resolve
Campaign Medal beginning on January 1, 2026.
(5) The department shall create the following additional designs
honoring persons who are serving or have served in the armed forces of
the United States and may begin issuing such license plates on January 1,
2026:
(a) One design that includes the word "veteran"; and
(b) One design that includes the word "veteran" and the
internationally accepted wheelchair symbol specified in section 60-3,113.
(6)(a) A person may qualify for a Military Honor Plate by
registering with the Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section
80-414. The Department of Motor Vehicles shall verify the applicant's
eligibility for a plate created pursuant to this section by consulting
the registry established by the Department of Veterans' Affairs.
(b) To be eligible for the license plates described in subdivision
(5)(b) of this section, in addition to any other eligibility requirements
for such license plates under this section:
(i) An application and proof of disability in the form and with the
information required by section 60-3,113.02 shall be submitted before
issuance or reissuance of such license plates; and
(ii) The handicap or disability of the handicapped or disabled
person shall be certified as permanent.
(7) The design shall be selected on the basis of limiting the
manufacturing cost of each plate to an amount less than or equal to the
-3-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
amount charged for license plates pursuant to section 60-3,102. The
Department of Motor Vehicles shall make applications available for each
type of plate when it is designed. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section and section
60-3,122.04.
(8) One type of Military Honor Plates shall be alphanumeric plates.
The department shall:
(a) Assign a designation up to five characters; and
(b) Not use a county designation.
(9) One type of Military Honor Plates shall be personalized message
plates. Such plates shall be issued subject to the same conditions
specified for personalized message license plates in section 60-3,118,
except that a maximum of five characters may be used.
(10) The department shall cease to issue Military Honor Plates
beginning with the next license plate issuance cycle after the license
plate issuance cycle that begins in 2023 pursuant to section 60-3,101 if
the total number of registered vehicles that obtained such plates is less
than one hundred per year within any prior consecutive two-year period.
Sec. 2. Section 60-3,122.04, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-3,122.04 (1)(a) An eligible person may apply to the department
for Military Honor Plates in lieu of regular license plates on an
application prescribed and provided by the department for any motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer, except for a motor vehicle or trailer
registered under section 60-3,198. An applicant receiving a Military
Honor Plate for a farm truck with a gross weight of over sixteen tons
shall affix the appropriate tonnage decal to the plate.
(b) The department shall make forms available for such applications
through the county treasurers.
(c) The license plates shall be issued upon payment of the license
fee described in subsection (2) of this section and verification by the
-4-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
department of an applicant's eligibility using the registry established
by the Department of Veterans' Affairs pursuant to section 80-414. To be
eligible an applicant shall be:
(i) Active duty or reserve duty armed forces personnel serving in
any of the armed forces listed in subsection (2) of section 60-3,122.03
or a veteran of any of such armed forces who was discharged or otherwise
separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under
honorable conditions);
(ii) A current or former commissioned officer of the United States
Public Health Service or National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
who has been detailed directly to any branch of such armed forces for
service on active or reserve duty and who was discharged or otherwise
separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under
honorable conditions) as proven with valid orders from the United States
Department of Defense, a statement of service provided by the United
States Public Health Service, or a report of transfer or discharge
provided by the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration;
(iii) A person who is serving or has served in the armed forces of
the United States and who has been awarded the Afghanistan Campaign
Medal, Iraq Campaign Medal, Global War on Terrorism Expeditionary Medal,
Southwest Asia Service Medal, Vietnam Service Medal, or Inherent Resolve
Campaign Medal;
(iv) For the license plate described in subdivision (5)(a) of
section 60-3,122.03, a person who is serving or has served in the armed
forces of the United States;
(v) For the license plate described in subdivision (5)(b) of section
60-3,122.03, a person who is serving or has served in the armed forces of
the United States and is permanently handicapped or disabled; or
(vi) A Beginning January 1, 2026, a trust that owns the motor
vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer if a designated beneficiary of the trust
qualifies under this subdivision (1)(c).
-5-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
(d) Any person using Military Honor Plates shall surrender the
plates to the county treasurer if such person is no longer eligible for
the plates. Regular plates shall be issued to any such person upon
surrender of the Military Honor Plates for a three-dollar transfer fee
and forfeiture of any of the remaining annual fee. The three-dollar
transfer fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.
(2)(a) In addition to all other fees required for registration under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, each application for initial issuance
or renewal of alphanumeric Military Honor Plates shall be accompanied by
a fee of five dollars. County treasurers collecting such fee fees
pursuant to this subdivision shall remit such fee them to the State
Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit such fee to the designated
recipient specified in subdivision (c) of this subsection. five dollars
of the fee to the Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System Operation Fund.
(b) In addition to all other fees required for registration under
the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, each application for initial issuance
or renewal of personalized message Military Honor Plates shall be
accompanied by a fee of forty dollars. County treasurers collecting such
fee fees pursuant to this subdivision shall remit such fee them to the
State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit twenty-five percent of
such the fee for initial issuance and renewal of such plates to the
Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of such
the fee to the designated recipient specified in subdivision (c) of this
subsection. Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System Operation Fund.
(c) The designated recipient for the fee paid for any license plate
described in:
(i) Subdivision (2)(a) or subsection (4) or (5) of section
60-3,122.03 is the Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System Operation Fund; or
(ii) Subdivision (2)(b) of section 60-3,122.03 is the Military
Department Aid Fund.
-6-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
(3)(a) When the department receives an application for Military
Honor Plates, the department may deliver the plates and registration
certificate to the applicant by United States mail or to the county
treasurer of the county in which the motor vehicle or trailer is
registered and the delivery of the plates and registration certificate
shall be made through a secure process and system. If delivery of the
plates and registration certificate is made by the department to the
applicant, the department may charge a postage and handling fee in an
amount not more than necessary to recover the cost of postage and
handling for the specific items mailed to the registrant. The department
shall remit the fee to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. The county treasurer or the department shall
issue Military Honor Plates in lieu of regular license plates when the
applicant complies with the other provisions of the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act for registration of the motor vehicle or trailer. If
Military Honor Plates are lost, stolen, or mutilated, the licensee shall
be issued replacement license plates upon request pursuant to section
60-3,157.
(b) The county treasurer or the department may issue temporary
license stickers to the applicant under this section for the applicant to
lawfully operate the vehicle pending receipt of the license plates. No
charge in addition to the registration fee shall be made for the issuance
of a temporary license sticker under this subdivision. The department
shall furnish temporary license stickers for issuance by the county
treasurer at no cost to the counties. The department may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations regarding the design and issuance of
temporary license stickers.
(4) The owner of a motor vehicle or trailer bearing Military Honor
Plates may apply to the county treasurer to have such plates transferred
to a motor vehicle or trailer other than the motor vehicle or trailer for
which such plates were originally purchased if such motor vehicle or
-7-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
trailer is owned by the owner of the plates. The owner may have the
unused portion of the fee for the plates credited to the other motor
vehicle or trailer which will bear the plates at the rate of eight and
one-third percent per month for each full month left in the registration
period. Application for such transfer shall be accompanied by a fee of
three dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subsection shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor
Vehicles Cash Fund.
(5) If the cost of manufacturing Military Honor Plates at any time
exceeds the amount charged for license plates pursuant to section
60-3,102, any money to be credited to the designated recipient specified
in subdivision (2)(c) of this section Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System
Operation Fund shall instead be credited first to the Highway Trust Fund
in an amount equal to the difference between the manufacturing costs of
Military Honor Plates and the amount charged pursuant to section 60-3,102
with respect to such plates and the remainder shall be credited to the
designated recipient specified in subdivision (2)(c) of this section
Nebraska Veteran Cemetery System Operation Fund.
(6) If the director discovers evidence of fraud in an application
for Military Honor Plates or that the holder is no longer eligible to
have Military Honor Plates, the director may summarily cancel the plates
and registration and send notice of the cancellation to the holder of the
license plates.
Sec. 3. (1) The Military Department Aid Fund is created. The
Adjutant General shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of
gifts, grants, bequests, money received from any public or private
source, money credited pursuant to section 60-3,122.04, and money
transferred to the fund by the Legislature.
(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest
-8-

LB786 LB786
2026 2026
or realized capital gains from any such investment shall be credited to
the Military Department Aid Fund.
(3) The Military Department Aid Fund shall only be used pursuant to
this section.
(4) The Adjutant General may award grants from the Military
Department Aid Fund pursuant to section 4 of this act.
Sec. 4. (1) A member of the Military Department may apply to the
Adjutant General for a grant under this section. The Adjutant General
shall prescribe the form for the application.
(2) The Adjutant General may award a grant to any member of the
Military Department who applies under this section and meets the
qualifications of an eligible grant recipient that are adopted and
promulgated in rules and regulations by the Adjutant General.
(3) The State of Nebraska shall not require or request any recipient
of a grant awarded under this section to reimburse any money received
from such grant.
(4) No later than January 1, 2027, the Adjutant General shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations for the qualifications of an
eligible grant recipient. Any such rules and regulations shall limit the
eligible recipients of any grant awarded under this section to needy
uniformed service members of the Military Department.
(5) The Adjutant General may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 5. Original sections 60-3,122.03 and 60-3,122.04, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-9-